Utah statutes.
19-6-106.   Rulemaking authority and procedure.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no rule which the board makes for the purpose of the state administering a program under the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act and, to the extent the  board may have jurisdiction, under the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, or the federal Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986, may be more stringent than the corresponding federal regulations which address the same circumstances. In making the rules, the board may incorporate by reference corresponding federal regulations.

(2)  The board may make rules more stringent than corresponding federal regulations for the purposes described in Subsection (1), only if it makes a written finding after public comment and hearing and based on evidence in the record that corresponding federal regulations are not adequate to protect public health and the environment of the state.  Those findings shall be accompanied by an opinion referring to and evaluating the public health and environmental information and studies contained in the record which form the basis for the conclusion.

